Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2677.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8117(b) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8117. Electronic toll collection.* * *(b) Imposition of liability.--Liability under this section shall be imposed upon an owner for failure to pay the prescribed toll charges assessed under this section or the regulations of the commission occurring within the territorial limits of this Commonwealth. Based on evidence obtained by a toll collection system, the following shall apply:* * *(1.3) The following limitations on text-based communications by the commission apply:123456789101112131415161718 (i) The commission, including an authorized agent, contracted third party or employee of the commission, may not send a text-based communication to the mobile phone of an owner notifying the owner of:(A) unpaid toll charges or fees that the owner is liable for under this section;(B) a link to an Internet website of the commission, including an authorized agent or contracted third party of the commission, through which the owner can electronically pay unpaid tolls or fees the owner is liable for under this section;(C) collection action that may or will be taken by the commission if the owner does not pay the unpaid tolls or fees the owner is liable for under this section; and(D) any other enforcement actions authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth that the commission may or will take if the owner does not pay the unpaid tolls or fees the owner is liable for under this section, including the suspension of the owner's registration under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1380 (relating to suspension of registration upon unpaid tolls).(ii) Subparagraph (i) shall not apply to text-based communications sent to a mobile phone by:(A) a collection agency contracted with the commission to an owner whose unpaid tolls and fees have been turned over to the collection agency to resolve payment of liability owed by the owner under this section;(B) the commission to an owner who has 20260HB2677PN3720 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established an account with the commission for electronic toll collection and has affirmatively consented to receiving text-based communications; and(C) the commission through a commission-approved mobile phone application installed on the mobile phone.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2677PN3720 - 3 - 12345678